sv: Stift - material: Aluminium; Kol; Kolfiber; Glasfiber; Kevlar; Plast; Titan; Trä; Övrigt
zh-CN: 棍棒材质: 铝; 碳; 碳纤维; 玻璃纤维; Kevlar; 塑料; 钛; 木头; 其他
el: Υλικό ραβδιού: Αλουμίνιο; Άνθρακας; Ανθρακόνημα; Υαλοβάμβακας; Kevlar; Πλαστικό; Τιτάνιο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
fr: Matériau du bâton: Aluminum; Carbone; Fibre de carbone; Fibre de verre; Kevlar; Plastique; Titane; Bois; Autre
vi: Vật liệu dính: Nhôm; Cacbon; Sợi carbon; Sợi thủy tinh; Kevlar; Nhựa; Titanium; Gỗ; Khác
ro-RO: Material baston: Aluminiu; Carbon; Fibră de carbon; Fibră de sticlă; Kevlar; Plastic; Titan; Lemn; Altele
nl: Materiaal stok: Aluminium; Koolstof; Koolstofvezel; Glasvezel; Kevlar; Plastic; Titanium; Hout; Andere
ru: Материал клюшки: Алюминий; Углерод; Углеродное волокно; Стекловолокно; Кевлар; Пластик; Титан; Дерево; Другое
ko: 스틱 소재: 알루미늄; 탄소; 탄소 섬유; 유리 섬유; Kevlar; 플라스틱; 티타늄; 목재; 기타
sk-SK: Materiál palice: Hliník; Uhlík; Uhlíkové vlákno; Sklolaminát; Kevlar; Plast; Titán; Drevo; Iné
da: Pindemateriale: Aluminum; Kulstof; Kulfiber; Glasfiber; Kevlar; Plast; Titanium; Træ; Andet
fi: Nokki-materiaali: Alumiini; Hiili; Hiilikuitu; Lasikuitu; Kevlar; Muovi; Titaani; Puu; Muu
lt-LT: Lazdos medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglis; Anglies pluoštas; Stiklo pluoštas; Kevlaras; Plastikas; Titanas; Mediena; Kita
pt-PT: Material pegajoso: Alumínio; Carbono; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidro; Kevlar; Plástico; Titânio; Madeira; Outro
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำก้าน: อะลูมิเนียม; คาร์บอน; เส้นใยคาร์บอน; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; Kevlar; พลาสติก; ไทเทเนียม; ไม้; อื่นๆ
it: Materiale adesivo: Alluminio; Carbonio; Fibra di carbonio; Vetroresina; Kevlar; Plastica; Titanio; Legno; Altro
pl: Materiał laski: Aluminium; Węgiel; Włókno węglowe; Włókno szklane; Kevlar; Tworzywo sztuczne; Titanium; Drewno; Inne
zh-TW: 條材料: 鋁; 碳; 碳纖維; 玻璃纖維; Kevlar; 塑膠; 鈦; 木材; 其他
pt-BR: Material do bastão: Alumínio; Carbono; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidro; Kevlar; Plástico; Titânio; Madeira; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal štapa: Aluminij; Ugljik; Karbonska vlakna; Stakloplastika; Kevlar; Plastika; Titanij; Drvo; Ostalo
tr: Çubuk malzeme: Alüminyum; Karbon; Karbon fiber; Fiberglas; Kevlar; Plastik; Titanyum; Ahşap; Diğer
cs: Materiál hůlky: Hliník; Uhlík; Uhlíkové vlákno; Skelná vata; Kevlar; Plast; Titanové; Dřevo; Jiné
de: Material des Stocks: Aluminium; Kohlenstoff; Kohlenstofffaser; Fiberglas; Kevlar; Kunststoff; Titan; Holz; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Material palice: Aluminij; Ogljik; Ogljikova vlakna; Steklena vlakna; Kevlar; Plastika; Titan; Les; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на стик: Алуминий; Въглерод; Въглеродни влакна; Fiberglass; Кевлар; Пластмаса; Титан; Дърво; Други
nb: Pinnemateriale: Aluminium; Karbon; Karbonfiber; Glassfiber; Kevlar; Plast; Titan; Trevirke; Annet
es: Material del palo: Aluminio; Carbón; Fibra de carbono; Fibra de vidrio; Kevlar; Plástico; Titanio; Madera; Otros
ja: スティック材料: アルミニウム; カーボン; カーボンファイバー; ガラス繊維; Kevlar; プラスチック; チタン; 木材; その他
en: Stick material: Aluminum; Carbon; Carbon fiber; Fiberglass; Kevlar; Plastic; Titanium; Wood; Other
hu: Bot anyaga: Alumínium; Szén; Szénszál; Üveggyapot; Kevlár; Műanyag; Titán; Fa; Egyéb